Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.340

Reciprocal agreements—When livestock from another state an estray, sale.

The director has the authority to enter into reciprocal agreements with any or all states to prevent the theft, misappropriation, or loss of identification of livestock. The director may declare any livestock which is shipped or moved into this state from those states estrays if the livestock is not accompanied by the proper inspection certificate or other certificates required by the law of the state of origin of the livestock. The director may hold the livestock subject to all costs of holding or sell the livestock and send the funds, after the deduction of the cost of the sale, to the proper authority in the state of origin of the livestock.

[ 2003 c 326 s 41; 1959 c 54 s 34.]